src/morphology/stems/abbreviations.lexc
LEXICON ITRAB   !!= * __@CODE@__ are intransitive abbreviations, A.S. etc.
Eftf ab-noun ;
Gess ab-dot-verb ; ! Gessojuvvon (ruovttoluotta)
Máks ab-dot-verb ; ! Máksojuvvon (ruovttoluotta)
vuorkááššenr ab-noun ; !
a.-g:a.-g ab-dot-noun; !
abstr ab-adj ;
adess:adess9 ab-noun ;
Alm ab-noun ;
Kol ab-noun ;
Jes ab-noun ;
Matt ab-noun ;
huám ab-dot-verb ;
omt ab-dot-adv ;
adj ab-noun ;
affekt ab-adj ;
akk/gen:akk/gen ab-noun; !
am ab-dot-adv ; !
attr ab-noun ;
biol ab-dot-adj ;
bot ab-dot-adj ;
bto ab-dot-adv ;
cc ab-dot-adv ; !
dearvvašvuođaosd ab-dot-noun ;
dem:dem9 ab-adj ;
dhj ab-dot-cc ; !
doaimm+Err/Orth:doaimm9 ab-noun ; !
dub ab-dot-adv ;
ei ab-dot-adv ; ! eereeb iärásij
el ab-dot-adv ; ! eres lasseen
etc ab-dot-adv ; ! etc
etc+Err/Orth:etc ab-nodot-adv ;
euf ab-dot-adv ; !
fac ab-dot-noun ; !
ff ab-adv ; !
fol ab-dot-adv ; !
fr ab-noun ; !
fuom:fuom9 ab-verb ;
geogr ab-dot-adj ; !geografiijas !
geom ab-dot-adj ; !geometrihkala !š
ger ab-dot-adj ;
hárv ab-dot-adv ; !hárvenaš, hárvenaččat
ij ab-dot-adv ; ! iärásij juávhust
impers ab-dot-noun ;
imprt ab-noun ;
interr:interr9 ab-dot-adj ;
intr ab-dot-adj ;
j ab-dot-verb ; ! jáámmám
j.d ab-dot-adv ; !
j.d.s ab-dot-adv ; !
j.s ab-dot-adv ; !
jd ab-dot-adv ; !
je ab-dot-adv ; !
jna ab-adv ; !já nuuvt ain
jno ab-adv ; !já nuuvt ovdâskulij
js ab-dot-adv ; ! jieijâs suuvâst / suuvâ
jv ab-adv ; !
kj ab-dot-verb ;
kom:kom9 ab-noun ;
konkr ab-dot-adj; !konkrehta
leasmedávdaosd:leasme#dávda#osd ab-dot-noun ;
mKr ab-dot-noun ; ! maŋa Kristus
matem ab-dot-adj ; !matematiik
mearrid ab-dot-verb ;
milj ab-num ;
miljo ab-dot-num ;
mill ab-num ;
dkl+Sem/Measr:dkl ab-noun ; ! dekalitter
cm+Sem/Measr:cm9 ab-noun ; ! senttimeetter
mrd ab-num ;
nd:nd9 ab-dot-adv ;
oKr ab-dot-adv ; ! ovdil Kristus
obj ab-noun ;
oss.jođ ab-dot-noun ;
ovttaj ab-dot-adj ;
ovttajie ab-dot-adj ;
ovttajien ab-dot-adj ;
pc ab-noun ; !personal computer
phil ab-dot-noun ;
pts ab-dot-noun ;
refl ab-adj ;
siviling:sivil#ing ab-dot-noun ;
skábm+Err/Lex:skábm9 ab-noun ; ! !Skábmamánnu
sl ab-dot-adv ;
š ab-dot-verb ; ! šoddâm
tme ab-adv ;
váldolávdeg ab-dot-noun ;
vs ab-adj ;
čilg+Err/Orth:čilg ab-nodot-noun ;
cm²+Sem/Measr:cm² ab-nodot-noun ;
h&m ab-nodot-noun ;
lx ab-nodot-noun ;
q.e.d ab-dot-noun ;
tn ab-noun ;
xii ab-nodot-noun ;
xv ab-nodot-noun ;
xxi ab-nodot-noun ;
xxix ab-nodot-noun ;
xxviii ab-nodot-noun ;
eur ab-nodot-noun ;
LEXICON TRNUMAB   !!= * __@CODE@__ contains abbreviations who are transitive in front of numerals 
RevBuš ab-noun ;
alm ab-dot-adj ; !
b ab-adv ; ! trab in 12. b. 2001 and "lea 30. b. mearidán…, but not in "Bohten geassemánu 3. b. Lean velá dáppe."
bc ab-dot-adv ; !bc. 30-42
bnr ab-noun ; !
fáksanr ab-dot-noun ;
mob:mob9 ab-noun ;
rieg ab-dot-IVprfprc ; !riegádan
rievd ab-dot-verb ;
tlf ab-noun ; !Also used without dot
mdb:mdb9 ab-nodot-adv  ;
mmb:mmb9 ab-nodot-adv  ;
Lág ab-dot-noun ;
LEXICON TRAB   !!= * __@CODE@__ contains transitive abbreviations
H.M ab-dot-adj ; !Hans/hennes majestet
Johs ab-dot-noun ; !Johannes
Od.% prp.% nr+Err/Orth:od.% prp.% nr ab-dot-noun ;
Ot.prop.nr+Err/Orth:ot.prop.nr ab-noun ;
Ot.prp.% nr+Err/Orth:ot.prp.% nr ab-noun ;
Sd.prp+Err/Orth:sd.prp ab-noun ;
St.dieđ.nr ab-dot-noun ; !
St.tid ab-dot-noun ;
buo ab-dot-verb ; !
ca ab-dot-adv ; !
cand.med ab-dot-noun ; !
dhj ab-dot-adv ; !dahje
dieđ.nr ab-noun ; !
dipl.ing ab-dot-noun ; !
ea ab-adj ; !
ea.ea ab-adj ; ! 15 %ea.ea without final dot.!
ee ab-adv ; !
el ab-adv ; !
eren ab-dot-adj ; !
eŋg+Err/Orth:eŋg ab-nodot-noun ;
fenr ab-dot-noun ; !
g.% b ab-adv ; ! gurut bealde
geahč ab-verb ; !Must accept no-dot
gield ab-dot-adj "Kildin" ; !
gárj ab-dot-adj ; !
gč ab-verb ; ! XXX accept no-dot (?) !
koord ab-dot-noun ; !
lul ab-dot-adj ; !lullisámegiela, lulesamisk
milj ab-dot-num ; !
mársm ab-dot-noun ; !
ne ab-dot-adj ; ! nuuvt ettum
ns ab-dot-adv ; ! nubij sanijgijn
nuort ab-dot-adj "Skolt" ; !
o.% b ab-adv ; !olgeš bealde
off ab-dot-adj ;
omd ab-adv ; ! sme
om ab-adv ; ! ovdâmerkkân
i.e ab-dot-adv ;
ot.prp ab-noun ;
ođđajagem+Err/Lex:ođđajagem ab-dot-noun; ! !
pharm ab-dot-adj ; !
polit ab-dot-adj ; !
pr ab-dot-adv ;
psyk ab-dot-adj ; !
r+CmpNP/None:r ab-dot-IVprfprc; !Lene: None er ukjent
sos ab-dot-adj ; !sosiálalaš
sá ab-dot-adj ; !
urál ab-dot-adj ; !urálalaš
vrd ab-verb ; ! verdid
vs ab-dot-cc ; !
čuo ab-adj ; !
C+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:C ab-nodot-noun;
G+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:G ab-nodot-noun;
K+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:K ab-nodot-noun;
O+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:O ab-nodot-noun;
S+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:S ab-nodot-noun;
W+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:W ab-nodot-noun;
Á+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:Á ab-nodot-noun;
Ö+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:Ö ab-nodot-noun;
Ŋ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First+Use/NG:Ŋ ab-nodot-noun;
a+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:a ab-nodot-noun;
e+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:e ab-nodot-noun;
i+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:i ab-nodot-noun;
m+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:m ab-nodot-noun;
u+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:u ab-nodot-noun;
å+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:å ab-nodot-noun;
ŧ+Use/SpellNoSugg+CmpNP/First:ŧ ab-nodot-noun;
A+Use/SpellNoSugg+Use/NG:A ab-dot-noun;
Š+Use/SpellNoSugg+Use/NG:Š ab-dot-noun;
á+Use/SpellNoSugg:á ab-dot-noun;
